src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vyelgid_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vyelgiđ: # MLO, checked
    vyelgiđ+V+Inf: vyelgiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuálgám
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuálgáh
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálgá
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelgeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vyelgivettee 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vyelgiv
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vyelgip
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vyelgivetteđ 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyelgih
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuolgim
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuolgih
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuolgij
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuolgijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuolgijd 
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuolgijn
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuolgijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuolgijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuolgii

    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuálgáččim
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuálgáččih
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuálgáččij
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuálgáččáim
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuálgáččáid
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuálgáččáin
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuálgáččijm
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuálgáččijd
    vyelgiđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuálgáččii

    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vyelgeem
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vyelgeeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vuolgiš
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vuolgižeen
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vuolgišvettee
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vuolgižává
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vuolgižep
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vuolgišvetteđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuolgižeh
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vyelgi
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuálgoon
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyelgee
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuálgup
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vyelgiđ
    vyelgiđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuálgus
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyelgi
    vyelgiđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuálgám

    vyelgiđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vuálgáá
    vyelgiđ+V+PrsPrc: vyelgee
    vyelgiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuálgám
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Nom: vyelgim
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Ess: vyelgimin
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Loc: vyelgimist
    vyelgiđ+V+Actio+Ill: vyelgimân

  Verb - pyehtiđ: #generated from FST; MLO checked
    pyehtiđ+V+Inf: pyehtiđ
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puávtám
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhtá # corp puáhtá?
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pyehtih
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puohtim
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puovtij
    pyehtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pyevti
    pyehtiđ+V+PrfPrc: puáhtám

  Verb - lyettiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    lyettiđ+V+Inf: lyettiđ
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luátám
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luáttá
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lyettih
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luottim
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luotij
    lyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lyeti
    lyettiđ+V+PrfPrc: luáttám

  Verb - vyeittiđ: #generated from FST, MLO checked
    vyeittiđ+V+Inf: vyeittiđ
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuáitám
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáittá
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyeittih
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoittim
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoitij
    vyeittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vyeiti
    vyeittiđ+V+PrfPrc: vuáittám
